Maryland, session 2026, HB1594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Department” means the State Department of Agriculture.
(i) “Secretary” means Secretary of Agriculture or his designee.
(J) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
5–207.
(b) (1) [Each] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (L) OF THIS SECTION, EACH
application for a certificate by a pest control consultant or pest control applicator shall be
accompanied by a $75 certificate fee plus $25 for each category in excess of one. [Each]
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (L) OF THIS SECTION, EACH application
for a private applicator certificate shall be accompanied by a fee of $7.
(L) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
8–806.
(a) Except for a government agency AND SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION, the Department shall charge the following fees under this subtitle:
(1) Certificate (nutrient management consultant) ................................ $50;
(2) License (individual or sole proprietorship) ...................................... $50;
(3) License (corporation or partnership) .............................................. $100;
(4) Renewal .................................................................................... $150; and

HOUSE BILL 1594
(5) Certificate (farm operator’s plan development) ............................... $20.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(1), (2), OR (4) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Department” means the Maryland Department of Labor.
(h) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Labor.
(J) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Foresters.
(d) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued by the
Board to practice forestry.
7–305.
(a) An applicant for a license shall:
(1) submit to the Board an application on the form that the Board provides;
and
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, pay to the Board an
application fee of $45.
(C) (1) THE BOARD MAY WAIVE AN APPLICATION FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.

HOUSE BILL 1594 7
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR THE
GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
7–306.
(a) If an applicant qualifies for a license under this subtitle, the Board shall mail
or electronically transmit to the applicant a notice that states that:
(1) the applicant has qualified for a license;
(2) on receipt of a $55 license fee OR GRANT OF A WAIVER UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, the Board will issue a license to the applicant; and
(3) if the applicant fails to pay the license fee within 30 days after receipt
of the notice, the applicant forfeits the right to be issued a license and, to obtain a license,
may be required to submit a new application and to pay a new application fee.
(E) (1) THE BOARD MAY WAIVE A LICENSE FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR THE
GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
7–308.
(c) (1) Before a license expires, the licensee periodically may renew it for an
additional 2–year term, if the licensee:
(i) otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(ii) except as provided in subsection (d) of this section AND SUBJECT
TO SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, pays to the Board a renewal fee of $100; and
(iii) submits to the Board a renewal application on the form that the
Board provides.
(d) A licensee serving on active duty in the uniformed services is exempt from the
renewal fee required by this section.
(H) (1) THE BOARD MAY WAIVE A RENEWAL FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.

HOUSE BILL 1594
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR THE
GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board of Pilots.
(d) (1) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued
by the Board to provide pilotage.
(2) “License” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, a limited
license.
11–406.
(a) If an applicant qualifies for a license under this subtitle, the Board shall send
the applicant a notice that states that:
(1) the applicant has qualified for a license; and
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, the Board will issue
the appropriate license to an applicant on receipt of a license fee of:
(i) $600 for an unlimited license;
(ii) $300 for a 40–foot–draft limited license;
(iii) $300 for a 36–foot–draft limited license; or
(iv) $200 for a 32–foot–draft limited license.
(D) (1) THE BOARD MAY WAIVE A LICENSE FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR THE
GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
11–408.
(c) Before a license expires, the licensee periodically may renew it for an
additional 2–year term, if the licensee:

HOUSE BILL 1594 9
(1) otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, pays to the Board a
renewal fee of:
(i) $600 for an unlimited license;
(ii) $300 for a 40–foot–draft limited license;
(iii) $300 for a 36–foot–draft limited license; or
(iv) $200 for a 32–foot–draft limited license; and
(3) submits to the Board a renewal application on the form that the Board
provides.
(E) (1) THE BOARD MAY WAIVE A RENEWAL FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE BOARD MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR THE
GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
13–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued by the
Secretary to conduct a business to provide private detective services.
(l) “Secretary” means the Secretary of State Police.
13–304.
(b) (1) [An] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION, AN applicant
for a license shall pay to the Secretary an application fee of:
(i) 1. $200, if the applicant is an individual; or
2. $375, if the applicant is a firm; and
(ii) the fees authorized under subsection (c)(2) of this section.
(2) (i) As part of the application for a license, the applicant shall submit
to the Secretary the fingerprints required under subsection (c)(2)(i) of this section.

HOUSE BILL 1594
(ii) If the applicant is a firm, the applicant shall pay the cost of the
fingerprint card record checks for each firm member.
(J) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE AN APPLICATION FEE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(I)1 OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
13–308.
(d) A licensee periodically may renew the license for an additional 3–year term, if
the licensee:
(1) otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, pays to the
Secretary in a method approved by the Secretary:
(i) a renewal fee of:
1. $200, if the licensee is an individual; or
2. $400, if the licensee is a firm; and
(ii) any late fee required under § 13–309 of this subtitle; and
(3) submits to the Secretary:
(i) a renewal application in the manner and format designated by
the Secretary; and
(ii) the statements required under § 13–309 of this subtitle.
(F) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE A RENEWAL FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(2)(I)1 OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
18–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1594 11
(e) “License” means a license issued by the Secretary or the Secretary’s designee
to engage in the business of providing security systems services for compensation.
(h) “Secretary” means the Secretary of State Police or the Secretary’s designee.
18–303.
(a) An applicant for a license shall:
(1) submit to the Secretary an application in the manner and format
designated by the Secretary;
(2) submit the documents required by this section; and
(3) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, pay to the
Secretary in a method approved by the Secretary:
(i) an application fee of $100;
(ii) the fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal
Procedure Article for access to Maryland criminal history records; and
(iii) the mandatory processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
(H) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE AN APPLICATION FEE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR THE
GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
18–307.
(d) An agency periodically may renew the license for an additional 3–year term,
if the license holder:
(1) otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (K) OF THIS SECTION, pays to the
Secretary in a method approved by the Secretary:
(i) a renewal fee of $100;

HOUSE BILL 1594
(ii) the fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal
Procedure Article for access to Maryland criminal history records;
(iii) the mandatory processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history records check; and
(iv) any late fee required under this subtitle; and
(3) submits to the Secretary:
(i) a renewal application in the manner and format designated by
the Secretary;
(ii) two complete sets of the applicant’s legible fingerprints taken in
a format approved by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation; and
(iii) satisfactory evidence of compliance with any other requirements
under this section for renewal of registration.
(K) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE A RENEWAL FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(2)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
19–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued by the
Secretary to conduct a business to provide security guard services.
(j) “Secretary”, unless the context requires otherwise, means the Secretary of
State Police.
19–304.
(b) (1) [An] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION, AN applicant
for a license shall pay to the Secretary an application fee of:
(i) 1. $200, if the applicant is an individual; or
2. $375, if the applicant is a firm; and

HOUSE BILL 1594 13
(ii) the fees authorized under subsection (c) of this section.
(2) (i) As part of the application for a license, the applicant shall submit
to the Secretary the fingerprints required under subsection (c) of this section.
(ii) If the applicant is a firm, the applicant shall pay the cost of the
fingerprint card record checks for each firm member.
(J) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE AN APPLICATION FEE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(I)1 OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
19–308.
(d) A licensee periodically may renew the license for an additional 3–year term, if
the licensee:
(1) otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, pays to the
Secretary in a method approved by the Secretary:
(i) a renewal fee of:
1. $200, if the licensee is an individual; or
2. $400, if the licensee is a firm;
(ii) payment for the cost of a fingerprint card record check by the
Federal Bureau of Investigation; and
(iii) any late fee required under § 19–309 of this subtitle; and
(3) submits to the Secretary:
(i) a renewal application in the manner and format designated by
the Secretary;
(ii) a complete set of the applicant’s legible fingerprints taken in a
format approved by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation;

HOUSE BILL 1594
(iii) the statements required under § 19–309 of this subtitle and any
other documentation that may be required by the Secretary to renew the agency license
under this subtitle; and
(iv) two photographs of the applicant in a format approved by the
Secretary.
(F) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE A RENEWAL FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(2)(I)1 OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
20–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “License” means a license issued by the Secretary to operate a business that
provides monitoring services for a fee to individuals who are under a court order that
requires monitoring by a private home detention monitoring agency.
(f) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services.
20–303.
(a) (1) An applicant for a license shall submit to the Secretary:
(i) an application on the form that the Secretary provides; and
(ii) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, an
application fee of $500.
(2) The application fee is nonrefundable.
(E) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE AN APPLICATION FEE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
20–310.

HOUSE BILL 1594 15
(a) As a condition for license renewal, a licensee shall submit to the Secretary
with the renewal application:
(1) a certification or, as authorized by the Secretary, other documentation
that the licensed private home detention monitoring agency has paid, for the past 2 years,
all withholding and Social Security taxes;
(2) a certification or, as authorized by the Secretary, other documentation
that the licensed private home detention monitoring agency has paid, for the past 2 years,
all other obligations employers are required to pay on behalf of their employees to the State
or federal government;
(3) a certificate of compliance issued by the State Workers’ Compensation
Commission, or the number of a workers’ compensation insurance policy or binder as
provided by § 9–105 of the Labor and Employment Article;
(4) a receipt from the Comptroller’s Office or, as authorized by the
Secretary, other documentation showing that the State income tax of the licensed private
home detention monitoring agency has been paid for the past 2 years;
(5) (i) a bond in accordance with the requirements of § 20–601 of this
title; and
(ii) proof of liability insurance, as required under § 20–602 of this
title; and
(6) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, a renewal fee of
$100.
(D) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE A RENEWAL FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(6) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – Business Regulation
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Clerk” means the clerk of the circuit court for the county with appropriate
jurisdiction.
(k) “Veteran” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State Government Article.

HOUSE BILL 1594
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Commission” means the State Athletic Commission.
4–305.
(a) An applicant for a license shall:
(1) submit to the Commission an application on the form that the
Commission provides; and
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, pay to the
Commission an application fee of:
(i) $10 for a license to participate as a wrestler or contestant in a
contest or to act as a second in a contest;
(ii) $15 for a license to act as a referee or judge in a contest;
(iii) $25 for a license to act as a manager of a contestant;
(iv) $25 for a license to act as a matchmaker of a contest; or
(v) $150 for a license to act as a promoter of a contest.
(C) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY WAIVE AN APPLICATION FEE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
4–405.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary
shall issue a license to an individual who:
(1) complies with § 4–404(a) of this subtitle or whose application has been
accepted under § 4–404(d) of this subtitle; and
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, pays to the
Secretary a $1,000 license fee.

HOUSE BILL 1594 17
(d) (1) An athlete agent may apply to renew a license by:
(i) submitting an application for renewal in a form required by the
Secretary; and
(ii) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, paying to the
Secretary a $1,000 renewal fee.
(2) The application for renewal must be signed by the applicant under
penalty of perjury and must contain current information on all matters required in an
original application for a license.
(G) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OR (D) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
8–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Maryland Home Improvement Commission.
8–404.
(a) [Before] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, BEFORE the
Commission issues a contractor license, the contractor shall pay a fee of $100 to be credited
to the Fund.
(D) (1) THE COMMISSION MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Dealer” means:

HOUSE BILL 1594
(i) an individual who acquires commercially from the public or
trades commercially with the public in secondhand precious metal objects;
(ii) an individual who for compensation arranges for the sale or
delivery of a secondhand precious metal object on behalf of a person that does not hold a
license under this title; or
(iii) unless otherwise provided, a pawnbroker.
(2) “Dealer” includes a retail jeweler as to transactions in which the retail
jeweler acquires commercially from the public or trades commercially with the public in
secondhand precious metal objects.
(e) “License” means a license issued by the Secretary to do business as a dealer.
12–202.
(a) (1) An applicant for a license shall:
(i) submit to the Secretary an application on the form that the
Secretary provides; and
(ii) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, pay to the
Secretary an application fee of $300.
(2) The application fee is nonrefundable.
(E) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE AN APPLICATION FEE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
12–207.
(c) Before a license expires, the licensee periodically may renew it for an
additional 2–year term, if the licensee:
(1) submits to the Secretary a renewal application on the form that the
Secretary provides;
(2) signs the renewal application under oath;

HOUSE BILL 1594 19
(3) updates the information submitted in the original application and
states that the information is current;
(4) except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, agrees to comply
with each requirement applicable to the original application;
(5) states that the licensee:
(i) has not violated this title;
(ii) has not been convicted of an offense specified in § 12–209 of this
subtitle; and
(iii) has not had a similar license denied, suspended, or revoked in
another jurisdiction;
(6) otherwise is entitled to be licensed; and
(7) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION, pays to the
Secretary a renewal fee of $265.
(I) (1) THE SECRETARY MAY WAIVE A RENEWAL FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(7) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
17–1404.
(a) An applicant for a promoter license shall:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, pay to the clerk a
license fee of $500; and
(2) get a health permit from the health officer.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE AN APPLICATION FEE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – Environment

HOUSE BILL 1594
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Department” means the Department of the Environment.
(Q) “VETERAN” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–901 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
15–801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) “Licensee” means a person who is authorized by the Department to conduct
surface mining and reclamation activities under § 15–807 of this subtitle.
15–807.
(c) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, THE
application shall be accompanied by a $400 fee.
(2) (i) [A] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, A license
renewal fee is $150.
(ii) A license shall be renewable annually.
(iii) The application for renewal shall be made annually by January
1.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(1) OR (2)(I) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – Financial Institutions
1–101.
(a) In this article, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following
words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1594 21
(g) “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Regulation in the
Maryland Department of Labor.
12–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “License” means a license issued in any form by the Commissioner under this
subtitle to engage in the business of money transmission, including as provided for through
NMLS.
12–407.
(a) (1) To apply for a license, an applicant shall:
(i) Complete, sign, and submit to the Commissioner an application
made under oath in the form, and in accordance with the process, that the Commissioner
requires; and
(ii) Provide all information that the Commissioner requests.
(2) The applicant shall comply with all conditions and provisions of the
application for a license.
(e) [With] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, WITH the
application, the applicant shall pay to the Commissioner:
(1) A nonrefundable investigation fee of $1,000; and
(2) A nonrefundable license fee of $2,000.
(H) (1) THE COMMISSIONER MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN, AS
DEFINED BY § 9–901 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – Natural Resources
1–106.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Veteran” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State Government Article.

HOUSE BILL 1594
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Department” means Department of Natural Resources.
(p) “Resident” means an individual who:
(1) For more than 6 months of the taxable year maintains a residence in
the State; or
(2) Moves to the State with the intent to be domiciled in the State.
(q) “Secretary” means Secretary of Natural Resources.
4–210.
(g) (1) The Department may issue a limited fishing guide license that is
applicable in all waters of the State to allow a license holder to guide:
(i) Anglers in up to 3 boats or vessels that:
1. Have 1 or 2 occupants; and
2. Are propelled by human power; or
(ii) 1. Except as provided in item 2 of this item, up to 10 anglers
fishing from shore or on foot in the water; or
2. Any number of anglers who are participating in an
educational or recreational program sponsored by a State, local, or municipal government
and who are fishing from shore or on foot in the water.
(2) A person may not accept any consideration for services as a fishing
guide licensed under this subsection unless the person and all persons being guided
possess, as applicable, an angler’s license issued under § 4–604 of this title or a Chesapeake
Bay and coastal sport fishing license issued under § 4–745 of this title.
(3) A recreational angler under the guidance of a limited fishing guide in
tidal waters may not:
(i) Catch or possess the species of fish known as the striped bass or
rockfish in the tidal waters designated in § 4–210.1(f) of this subtitle; and
(ii) From March 1 through May 31, catch or attempt to catch the
species of fish known as the striped bass or rockfish in spawning areas and rivers, including

HOUSE BILL 1594 23
all waters north of a line from Abbey Point to Worton Point, including the Sassafras River,
Bohemia River, Elk River, Northeast River, Susquehanna River, Susquehanna Flats, and
the Chesapeake and Delaware Canal.
(h) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION, THE fee for a
limited fishing guide license under subsection (g) of this section shall be:
(i) For a resident, $50; and
(ii) For a nonresident, $100.
(2) All fees collected by the Department under this subsection shall be used
for monitoring the freshwater fishery.
(I) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
4–210.1.
(b) An applicant for a license shall:
(1) Submit to the Department an application on the form that the
Department requires;
(2) [Pay] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION, PAY to the
Department an application fee of:
(i) $20 for residents or $50 for nonresidents to operate in nontidal
freshwater; and
(ii) $50 for residents or $100 for nonresidents to operate in nontidal
freshwater and the areas of tidal water designated in subsection (f) of this section; and
(3) Possess any necessary fishing licenses and stamps.
(c) (1) Before a freshwater fishing guide license expires, the licensee may
renew the license for an additional 1 year term.
(2) The licensee may renew a freshwater fishing guide permit if the
licensee:

HOUSE BILL 1594
[(1)] (I) Otherwise is entitled to hold the license;
[(2)] (II) Submits to the Department a renewal application on the form
that the Department requires; and
[(3)] (III) [Submits] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION,
SUBMITS to the Department the annual license application fee under subsection (b) of this
section.
(J) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(2) OR (C)(2)(III) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
RESIDENT VETERAN.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT
PROVIDE FOR THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT GRANT A WAIVER UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION BEFORE ADOPTING REGULATIONS THAT GOVERN THE WAIVER OF THE
FEE REQUIRED.
4–211.
(b) (1) A person desiring a taxidermist and fur–tanning license shall:
(i) Apply on forms the Secretary supplies;
(ii) [Pay] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, PAY a
$50 annual license fee; and
(iii) Provide recent work samples for examination by the
Department.
(2) [Upon] ON receipt of the application and license fee, and examination
of work samples, the Secretary may issue the license permitting the practice of taxidermy
or fur–tanning, as provided in the license, if the work samples meet minimum professional
standards, as determined by the Department.
(c) A taxidermist and fur–tanning license:
(1) Shall expire on June 30 following the date of issuance; and
(2) May be renewed by providing information on forms the Secretary
supplies and, SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, paying the $50 annual
license fee.

HOUSE BILL 1594 25
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
4–604.
(b) (1) Any person 16 years old or older shall secure an angler’s license to fish
in the nontidal waters of the State.
(2) An angler’s license entitles the holder to fish in the nontidal waters of
the State only during the open season.
(d) A person who wishes to obtain an angler’s license shall complete and submit
an application to the Department or to any person designated by the Department to issue
an angler’s license.
(f) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection AND SUBSECTION (J) OF
THIS SECTION, the following annual license fees shall apply:
(i) Resident ................................................................................... $32
(ii) Subject to paragraph (2)(ii) of this subsection, short–term license
valid for 7 consecutive days from date of issuance ........................................................... $16
(iii) Resident and nonresident blind persons ............................ No fee
(iv) Complimentary license ....................................................... No fee
(2) [For] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (J) OF THIS SECTION, FOR a
nonresident:
(i) The fee for an annual angler’s license is the greater of:
1. $55; or
2. A fee equal to the fee charged a Maryland resident by the
nonresident’s home state for a similar license; and
(ii) The fee for a short–term license valid for 7 consecutive days from
the date of issuance is the greater of:
1. $45; or

HOUSE BILL 1594
2. A fee equal to the fee charged a Maryland resident by the
nonresident’s home state for a license that permits an equal number of days of fishing or
the next higher number of days as permitted by the Maryland license.
(iii) The fee for a short–term license valid for 3 consecutive days from
the date of issuance is the greater of:
1. $35; or
2. A fee equal to the fee charged a Maryland resident by the
nonresident’s home state for a license that permits an equal number of days of fishing or
the next higher number of days as permitted by the Maryland license.
(3) The Department shall implement a program to provide discounted
angler’s licenses and trout stamps to Maryland residents who are recipients of the Purple
Heart Award.
(4) (i) All fees collected by the Department under this section may only
be used in accordance with § 4–208 of this title.
(ii) The Department shall publicly report annually the amounts
collected and the expenditures under this section.
(J) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
4–614.
(a) (1) The Department shall adopt regulations to establish fishing areas
where a trout stamp is required.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, a person may
not fish or possess trout in an area established in paragraph (1) of this subsection unless
the person first obtains a trout stamp in addition to an angler’s license.
(3) A trout stamp is not required of the following:
(i) A holder of a lifetime complimentary angler’s license issued
under § 4–607(a)(2) or (3) of this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 1594 27
(ii) A person authorized by a disability exemption issued under §
4–217 of this title;
(iii) Any resident serving in the armed forces of the United States
while on leave in the State, during the resident’s leave period, if, while angling, the resident
possesses a copy of the resident’s official leave order; or
(iv) A person under 16 years of age.
(4) The stamp may be obtained from the Department or an authorized
agent of the Department.
(c) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE following
annual trout stamp fees shall apply:
(1) Resident .............................................................................................. $20
(2) Nonresident ........................................................................................ $30
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
4–701.
(a) Except as provided in §§ 4–701.1 and 4–701.2 of this subtitle, this section
applies to any person who is required under this subtitle or Subtitle 2, 8, 9, or 10 of this
title to be licensed to guide fishing parties or to catch, sell, buy, process, transport, export,
or otherwise deal in fish caught in tidal waters.
(b) (1) Except as provided in §§ 4–701.1 and 4–701.2 of this subtitle, the
Department shall [utilize] USE a single, commercial license, to be known and designated
as a tidal fish license.
(2) A tidal fish license authorizes a licensee:
(i) To engage in each activity indicated on the license; and
(ii) For catching blue crabs, to [utilize] USE the number of crew
members authorized under § 4–814 of this title.

HOUSE BILL 1594
(3) Except for a person receiving a license as a beneficiary of a deceased
licensee under subsection (k)(4)(i) of this section, the Department may not issue a tidal fish
license to an individual who is younger than 14 years of age.
(4) A person may not guide fishing parties or catch, sell, buy, process,
transport, export, or otherwise deal in fish caught in tidal waters unless licensed under this
section.
(c) (1) The license year for every tidal fish license shall be 12 months from
September 1 through August 31 of the following year.
(2) A licensee and crew members may engage only in those activities for
which the annual fees for that license year have been paid.
(d) (1) The Department may issue no more than one authorization to a person
to engage in each activity under paragraph (2)(ii)1 and 2 of this subsection during a license
year.
(2) (i) On a tidal fish license, the Department may issue an
authorization for any of the following activities for which the indicated fee has been paid.
(ii) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (S) OF THIS SECTION, THE
following annual fees for an authorization shall apply regardless of when the license is
issued or an activity is authorized:
1. To provide services as:
A. A fishing guide in the tidal waters of Maryland – $100 for
a resident and $200 for a nonresident; and
B. A master fishing guide, in addition to the fee under item
A of this item – $100 per vessel;
2. To catch for sale fish with equipment which is legal under
this title:
A. Finfish:
I. Hook and line only, anywhere – $100; and
II. All other equipment – $150;
B. Blue crabs:
I. Up to 50 pots, trotlines, nets, dip nets, traps, pounds, and
scrapes – $100; and

HOUSE BILL 1594 29
II. Over 50 pots, plus any other gear listed in item I of this
item – $150;
C. Clams – $100;
D. Oysters – $250 for a dredge boat and $100 for other than
a dredge boat;
E. Conch, turtles, lobster, and all crabs of the genus
Cancer – $100; and
F. For all activities in item 1A of this subparagraph and in
items A through E of this item, unlimited tidal fish – $300;
3. For one or two crew members employed under § 4–814 of
this title to enable a licensee to catch blue crabs under item 2BII and F of this subparagraph
with more than 300 pots, the licensee shall pay an additional:
A. $100 for up to 600 pots total per vessel; or
B. $150 for up to 900 pots total per vessel;
4. For a person to buy, process, pack, resell, market or
otherwise deal in fish caught in the tidal waters of Maryland, seafood dealer:
A. $50 for a person licensed under item 2 of this
subparagraph or § 4–701.1 or § 4–701.2 of this subtitle; or
B. $250 for a person not licensed under item 2 of this
subparagraph; and
5. For a person who is not licensed under this section to land
fish caught in out–of–state tidal waters, seafood landing – $350.
(e) (1) Before catching fish for sale under an authorization issued under
subsection (d)(2)(ii)2 of this section, a tidal fish licensee shall obtain a harvester
registration from the Department.
(2) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (S) OF THIS SECTION, THE annual
fee for a harvester registration is $215.
(3) A harvester registration is nontransferable.
(f) [For] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (S) OF THIS SECTION, FOR a tidal fish
license, the Department may issue a permit for any of the following activities for which the
indicated annual fee has been paid:

HOUSE BILL 1594
(1) To catch for sale:
(i) Striped bass:
1. $200 for a licensee authorized under subsection
(d)(2)(ii)2A of this section; or
2. $150 for a licensee authorized under subsection
(d)(2)(ii)2F of this section;
(ii) Yellow perch: $25;
(iii) Horseshoe crab: $25;
(iv) Black sea bass: $25;
(v) Summer flounder: $25; or
(vi) Snapping turtle: $25.
(2) The Department may establish by regulation a permit and an annual
permit fee not exceeding $25 for any species not subject to a permit under this subsection.
(g) (1) (i) A person may not catch oysters for sale without:
1. Possessing a valid license under this section;
2. [Paying] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (S) OF THIS
SECTION, PAYING an annual surcharge of $300; and
3. Certifying to the Department that the person received the
publications required under § 4–1006.2 of this title.
(ii) The Department shall use the surcharges collected under this
paragraph only for oyster repletion activities.
(2) In addition to the normal license fees imposed under subsection
(d)(2)(ii)2 and 4 of this section, a licensee shall pay to the Department an annual surcharge
in the following amounts to be credited to the Seafood and Aquaculture Products Marketing
Fund established under § 10–1002 of the Agriculture Article:
(i) To fund only the marketing of wild–caught seafood, $20 for a
licensee authorized under subsection (d)(2)(ii)1, 2, 3, or 5 of this section, if the licensee is
not also authorized under subsection (d)(2)(ii)4 of this section; or
(ii) To fund only the marketing of wild–caught seafood and
aquaculture products, $50 for a licensee authorized under subsection (d)(2)(ii)4 of this

HOUSE BILL 1594 31
section, regardless of whether the licensee is also authorized under subsection (d)(2)(ii)1, 2,
3, or 5 of this section.
(3) (i) 1. In this paragraph, “fishing activities” means those
activities that are directly related to catching fish.
2. “Fishing activities” does not include the activities of
buying, selling, processing, transporting, exporting, or similarly dealing in fish.
(ii) For every nonresident license issued under this subtitle and
Subtitles 8 and 9 of this title, except under subsection (d)(2)(ii)1A of this section, the
Department shall assess an annual surcharge in addition to the normal license fees
imposed by this subsection, which shall be the greater of:
1. An amount equal to the difference between the total fees
charged to a Maryland resident engaged in like fishing activities in the state of residence
of the nonresident applicant and the total of normal license fees for fishing activities in
Maryland; or
2. $450.
(h) The Department may assess annually on every person licensed under
subsection (d)(2)(ii)2 of this section a surcharge for the costs incurred by the Department
for:
(1) Fish tags issued to the licensee; and
(2) The use by a licensee of a hailing system.
(i) (1) The Department shall accept applications for new authorizations to
participate in fishing activities under subsection (d)(2)(ii)1 or 2 of this section from qualified
persons and maintain a waiting list of candidates for each fishing activity in order of the
date and time that applications are received.
(2) An applicant for a license to provide services as a commercial fishing
guide in tidal waters of the State shall supply as part of the application verifiable references
to any federal license that is issued by the U.S. Coast Guard to operate a vessel carrying
passengers for hire in the applicant’s name, as a condition precedent to engaging as a
commercial fishing guide in tidal waters.
(j) (1) The Department may set by regulation targets for the number of tidal
fish license authorizations under subsection (d)(2)(ii) of this section to be the number issued
between September 1, 1998, and March 31, 1999.
(2) The Department may modify by regulation the target number of
authorizations based on:

HOUSE BILL 1594
(i) Recommendations of the Tidal Fisheries Advisory Commission;
(ii) Recommendations of fishery management plans adopted by the
Department, the Chesapeake Bay Program, the Atlantic States Marine Fisheries
Commission, the Mid–Atlantic Fisheries Management Council, or any other appropriate
management body;
(iii) The number of people historically participating;
(iv) Target species, size, number, weight, incidental catch, total
biomass, annual harvest, mortality rates, and other factors which are necessary and
appropriate; and
(v) The number of authorizations relinquished to the Department
under subsection (m) of this section.
[(2)] (3) (i) The Department shall by regulation limit the total number
of commercial authorizations to fish for striped bass not to exceed 1,231 participants in the
commercial fishery and 499 participants in the charter boat fishery.
(ii) The Department shall provide in its regulations for reallocation
of any authorizations that may be revoked or voluntarily relinquished to the Department.
(iii) The Department shall provide in its regulations for the allocation
of any available quota on a monthly basis to ensure that all areas of the State have ample
opportunity to attain an equitable portion of the available quota.
(k) (1) A license or authorization may be transferred only under the provisions
of this subsection.
(2) A person who desires to obtain a license or authorization by transfer
under this subsection shall, for each license or authorization applied for:
(i) [Pay] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (S) OF THIS SECTION, PAY a
$50 application fee; and
(ii) Submit a completed application to the Department.
(3) The Department shall review and may approve the permanent transfer
of a license or an authorization to a person who is the licensee’s spouse, daughter, son,
stepchild, grandchild, stepgrandchild, parent, sister, brother, grandparent, aunt, uncle,
niece, nephew, father–in–law, mother–in–law, son–in–law, daughter–in–law,
sister–in–law, or brother–in–law.
(4) (i) On the death of a licensee, the Department shall review and may
approve the permanent transfer of a license or authorization to the person indicated on the
beneficiary form submitted by the deceased licensee.

HOUSE BILL 1594 33
(ii) The personal representative of the estate of the deceased licensee
may retain the license or authorization for 2 years from the date of appointment as personal
representative if:
1. The deceased licensee did not indicate a license
beneficiary;
2. The Department determines that the license beneficiary is
not qualified to receive the license or authorization; or
3. The license beneficiary does not accept the license or
authorization.
(iii) On appointment, the personal representative shall notify the
Department of the appointment and the intent to retain the license or authorization.
(iv) A license or authorization retained under this paragraph may be
renewed annually as required by this title.
(v) Before the end of the 2–year period, the personal representative
may submit a completed transfer application to transfer the license or authorization to a
qualified individual.
(vi) If a license or authorization is not transferred under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, and a transfer application is not submitted under
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the license or authorization is void.
(vii) A person may not operate under the license or authorization of
the deceased licensee without approval of the application by the Department.
(5) (i) Twice per license year, the Department may approve a
temporary transfer of a license or authorization for not more than the remainder of the
license year.
(ii) A temporary transferee who is convicted or receives an accepted
plea of nolo contendere for a violation of federal or State fisheries law that results in a
license suspension or revocation may not engage in that fishing activity or receive a transfer
of a tidal fish license during the period of suspension or revocation.
(6) The Department may approve the permanent transfer of a license or
authorization under this subsection from a person who has held a valid tidal fish license
for at least 2 years to a person who provides a notarized bill of sale for the license or
authorization being transferred.

HOUSE BILL 1594
(7) (i) Except for a fishing guide licensee or a master fishing guide
licensee, a licensee may allow one individual to use the licensee’s commercial fishing vessel
to engage in activities authorized under the license if:
1. The licensee’s commercial fishing vessel number is
registered on the license; and
2. The licensee has identified the assigned individual to the
Department on a form provided by the Department.
(ii) A licensee may change the assignment once per license year.
(iii) If a licensee allows an individual to [utilize] USE a vessel under
this paragraph, the individual and the licensee shall be held responsible for any violations
committed by the individual using the vessel.
(l) (1) Notwithstanding the qualification criteria for a license and
authorization to engage in an activity under this section, licensees may renew a harvester
registration and any valid existing authorizations on their licenses annually.
(2) (i) Application to renew a tidal fish license shall be made not later
than August 31, or the next business day in the instance that the Department is not open,
for the following license year.
(ii) The Department may not accept application for renewal after
that date, as stated in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph unless:
1. Application is made by March 31, or the next business day
in the instance that the Department is not open, of the following license year;
2. The applicant shows good cause why application was not
made by August 31 of the previous license year; and
3. A late fee of $50 is paid by the applicant in addition to the
license fee.
(m) (1) (i) A licensee who possesses an unlimited tidal fish license under
subsection (d)(2)(ii)2F of this section may relinquish the unlimited tidal fish license and
receive one or more authorizations under subsection (d)(2)(ii)1A through E of this section.
(ii) If the fee for an unlimited tidal fish license is less than the total
of the fees for authorizations received by a licensee under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, the licensee shall pay to the Department an amount equal to the difference
between the fee for the unlimited tidal fish license and the total of the fees for the
authorizations received.

HOUSE BILL 1594 35
(2) The Department shall adjust the number of authorizations under
subsection (d)(2)(ii) of this section to reflect the number of license conversions under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(n) (1) In addition to any other penalty provided in this title, the Department
may suspend or revoke a person’s entitlement to engage in a particular activity or activities
under a tidal fish license.
(2) During a period of suspension or revocation imposed by the
Department, the person penalized is not and shall not be authorized under any existing,
renewed, transferred, or new tidal fish license to engage in the particular activity or
activities for which the suspension is imposed.
(3) The following are grounds for suspension or revocation of a tidal fish
license:
(i) Making any false statement in an application for a tidal fish
license;
(ii) A serious violation of a State or federal commercial fisheries law
that results in a conviction or an accepted plea of nolo contendere;
(iii) Failure to submit reports required by the provisions of this title
or by the Department pursuant to provisions of this title; or
(iv) Failure for a nonresident of the State to appear in court pursuant
to a citation issued by a Natural Resources police officer, or to any other process issued by
any court of Maryland, for violation of this title.
(4) A penalty imposed in accordance with this subtitle shall be in addition
to any other penalty authorized under § 4–1201 of this title regarding striped bass.
(5) The Department, in consultation with the Tidal Fisheries Advisory
Commission and the Sport Fisheries Advisory Commission, shall adopt regulations relating
to the suspension and revocation of licenses and authorizations issued under this title,
including:
(i) A schedule of points assigned to various offenses under this title;
(ii) A schedule of the maximum number of days that a license may
be suspended according to the number of points accumulated;
(iii) Suspension or revocation of a license or authorization for a
serious violation of a State or federal commercial fisheries law that results in an individual
receiving a conviction or an accepted plea of nolo contendere;
(iv) Enhanced penalties for repeated violations of this title; and

HOUSE BILL 1594
(v) Enhanced penalties for violations of provisions of this title that
regulate species deemed by the Department to be in need of special protection, including
striped bass, crabs, oysters, and menhaden.
(6) (i) Before the suspension or revocation of a tidal fish license under
this section, the Department shall notify the licensee in writing of the licensee’s right to a
hearing on request.
(ii) If a licensee submits a written request for a hearing to the
Department within 30 days after the date that the notice required under this paragraph is
mailed, the Department shall:
1. Hold a hearing after providing at least 10 days’ notice to
the licensee; and
2. Conduct the hearing in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle
2 of the State Government Article.
(iii) The Department may suspend a commercial license issued under
this title without a hearing if:
1. The licensee does not submit a written request for a
hearing; or
2. The licensee fails to appear for a scheduled hearing for
which the Department provided notice.
(o) (1) If a person is engaged in an activity for which a license or authorization
is required under this section, the person shall possess:
(i) Any required license, authorization, registration, or permit; and
(ii) For a person to whom a license or authorization has been
temporarily transferred, documentation indicating the Department’s approval of the
temporary transfer application.
(2) (i) This paragraph does not limit the Department’s authority to
inspect books, statements, and accounts under § 4–206(b) of this title.
(ii) The licensee or any person to whom a licensee has transferred a
license under subsection (k) of this section shall allow any police officer, at reasonable
times, including when the licensee or person is engaged in an activity that requires a license
under this section, to inspect:
1. The license, authorization, or permit;

HOUSE BILL 1594 37
2. Any applicable application to transfer the commercial
tidal fish license approved by the Department for a temporary transfer;
3. Commercial fishing vessels;
4. Vehicles used to transport fish for commercial purposes;
and
5. Fish businesses owned or operated by a person licensed
under this section.
(iii) Inspections of vessels, vehicles, and businesses authorized under
this paragraph shall be restricted to inspections of fishing gear and places where fish may
be stored.
(iv) Inspections of businesses authorized under this paragraph may
be conducted in any building other than a dwelling house.
(3) (i) An inspector may seize fishing gear or fish found during an
inspection under this subsection that is used or possessed in connection with a violation of
this title or a regulation adopted under this title.
(ii) Fishing gear seized under this paragraph shall be held by the
Department pending disposition of court proceedings, and on conviction the property seized
or proceeds from the seizure shall be forfeited to the State for destruction or disposition as
the Department may deem appropriate.
(iii) The Department may dispose of fish seized under this paragraph
at its discretion.
(p) The Department shall assign a permanent identification number to each
licensee. A licensee shall display the identification number on every vessel, vehicle, gear,
or place of business, as the Department may require by regulation.
(q) The Department shall:
(1) Deposit to the credit of the Fisheries Research and Development Fund
all fees received for tidal fish licenses, authorizations, and permits under this section; and
(2) Use the funds received from the sale of striped bass surcharges for
striped bass management and enforcement purposes.
(r) (1) This subsection applies only to a person who, on April 1, 1997:
(i) Held a valid fishing guide license; and
(ii) Either:

HOUSE BILL 1594
1. Owned two or more vessels used to carry passengers for
fishing;
2. Owned or operated a federally licensed vessel of 50 tons or
more that was used to carry passengers for fishing; or
3. Owned or operated a marina from which 10 or more
vessels operate to carry passengers for fishing.
(2) A person who meets the requirements of paragraph (1) of this
subsection may obtain an annual master fishing guide license by:
(i) Filing an application on a form provided by the Department;
(ii) Supplying with the application proofs of ownership of the
required vessels; and
(iii) Paying the master fishing guide license fee set forth in subsection
(d)(2)(ii)1 of this section.
(3) A person holding a master fishing guide license may:
(i) Employ other persons to guide fishing parties on vessels owned
by the master fishing guide; and
(ii) Allow a person who holds a valid Coast Guard license to operate
a vessel to carry passengers for fishing from the marina owned or operated by the master
guide license holder authorized under paragraph (1)(ii)3 of this subsection as follows:
1. One person for 10 vessels;
2. Two persons for 11 to 20 vessels;
3. Three persons for 21 to 30 vessels;
4. Four persons for 31 to 40 vessels;
5. Five persons for 41 to 50 vessels; and
6. Six persons for 51 or more vessels.
(4) (i) The Department shall issue a number of copies of the master
fishing guide license corresponding to the number of vessels owned or operated by the
master fishing guide, with each copy bearing the registration number of one of the vessels.

HOUSE BILL 1594 39
(ii) The master fishing guide shall ensure that when a vessel is
operated, the appropriate copy of the license is on board.
(5) If a master fishing guide employs another person to operate a vessel to
carry passengers for fishing, for purposes of the license suspension criteria in subsection
(n) of this section, the master fishing guide shall be held responsible for any violations
committed by the person employed to operate the vessel.
(S) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
4–745.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section and § 4–217
of this title, a person may not fish for finfish in the Chesapeake Bay or in its tributaries up
to tidal boundaries or in State waters of the Atlantic Ocean and the Atlantic coastal bays
and their tributaries without first obtaining a Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing
license or registration issued under subsection (d)(3) of this section and possessing the
license or registration.
(2) The license may be obtained from the Department or from any
authorized agent of the Department.
(3) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection AND SUBSECTION (G) OF
THIS SECTION, the following annual license fees shall apply:
(i) Resident ................................................................................... $15
(ii) Short–term resident license valid for 7 consecutive days from
date of issue …………………………………………………………………………………………..$6
(iii) For a short–term nonresident license valid for 7 consecutive days
from date of issue …………………………………………………………………………………..$12
(iv) Nonresident ........................................................................ $22.50
(v) Resident and nonresident blind persons ............................ No fee
(vi) Complimentary license under subsection (e) of this
section ……………………………………………………………………………………………No fee

HOUSE BILL 1594
(4) The Department shall implement a program to provide discounted
Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing licenses to Maryland residents who are recipients
of the Purple Heart Award.
(5) Except as provided in subsection (d)(1) of this section, every
Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing license and registration shall be valid for 1 year
following the date of issuance.
(6) An applicant for a license issued under this section:
(i) Shall provide all the information requested by the Department;
and
(ii) May not willfully make a false statement or representation to the
Department on the application.
(b) (1) The Department may designate a person engaged in a commercial
enterprise to sell the Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing license or issue a
registration under subsection (d) of this section as an agent under the Department’s control
and supervision.
(2) (i) As compensation, the agent shall retain $1 for each license
issued.
(ii) There is no agent compensation for each registration issued.
(d) (1) (I) The Department may provide by regulation for issuance of a
special charter boat license that shall be effective for not more than 1 year and shall expire
on August 31 and that would be valid for all individuals on a single vessel operated by a
fishing guide licensed under § 4–210.1 of this title or § 4–701 of this subtitle or for all
individuals on a vessel under the guidance of a fishing guide licensed under § 4–210 of this
title in tidal waters of the State.
(II) The fee shall be:
[(i)] 1. For 6 fishermen or less .............................................. $240.
[(ii)] 2. For 7 or more fishermen ............................................ $290.
(2) (i) The Department may provide by regulation for issuance of an
annual special Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing license, which when permanently
affixed to a boat registered in any state shall authorize any person on the boat to fish for
finfish in the Chesapeake Bay or in its tributaries up to tidal boundaries or in State waters
of the Atlantic Ocean and the Atlantic coastal bays and their tributaries, except that such
a license may not be used on a boat that has been hired to take such persons fishing.

HOUSE BILL 1594 41
(ii) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, THE
annual fee for this special license shall be:
1. For a resident applicant .............................................. $50.
2. For a nonresident applicant ...................................... $100.
(iii) 1. If a boat owner purchases the special license under this
paragraph, the boat owner may fish anywhere in the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries
or the State waters of the Atlantic Ocean and the Atlantic coastal bays and their
tributaries, whether the boat owner is fishing in the owner’s boat, in another person’s boat,
on land, or elsewhere.
2. The Department shall issue a complimentary Chesapeake
Bay and coastal sport fishing license to the boat owner who purchases a special license
under this paragraph.
3. If a boat to which the special license is affixed has more
than one owner, [then] only the individual applicant who signs the application for the
special license shall be entitled to a complimentary Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport
fishing license under this paragraph.
(3) (i) An individual shall register with the Department before fishing
in any of the following areas that do not require a Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing
license:
1. A free fishing area established under § 4–214(b)(1) of this
title with hook and line;
2. On private real property bordering on tidal water as an
owner or tenant of the property, or a spouse or an immediate family member who resides
on the property with the owner or tenant; and
3. On a boat licensed under paragraph (2) of this subsection.
(ii) There is no fee for registration under this paragraph.
(iii) An individual required to register under this paragraph shall
provide all the information requested by the Department.
(4) (i) 1. The Department may provide by regulation for the
issuance of a special commercial fishing pier license that is valid for all individuals fishing
from the pier in tidal waters of the State.
2. The annual fee for the special commercial fishing pier
license shall be $290.

HOUSE BILL 1594
(ii) Individuals fishing from a licensed commercial fishing pier are
exempt from purchasing a Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing license.
(iii) 1. The owner or operator of a licensed commercial fishing
pier shall maintain a log of the contact information of the persons fishing from that
structure each day.
2. The logs required under subsubparagraph 1 of this
subparagraph must be submitted electronically as prescribed or approved by the
Department.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
5–419.
(a) Subject to [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (E) of this section, an applicant
shall pay to the Department at the time of making application, a fee set by the Department
by regulation.
(b) (1) A tree expert license shall be renewed in accordance with a timetable
and procedure established by the Department by regulation.
(2) Subject to [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (c) AND (E) of this section, a
person who holds a license and wishes to renew it shall pay a fee set by the Department by
regulation.
(3) After September 1, 2017, to qualify for the renewal of a tree expert
license, a licensed tree expert shall complete the professional development curriculum
established by the Department by regulation.
(c) Fees established in accordance with this section may not exceed:
(1) For the examination fee .................................................................... $45;
(2) For the initial license fee ........................................................... $55; and
(3) For the renewal fee ......................................................................... $100.
(d) (1) Fees the Department receives shall be paid into the State Treasury for
the Department’s use.

HOUSE BILL 1594 43
(2) (i) The Secretary shall prepare an annual report on the number of
licenses issued and the receipts and expenses under Part III of this subtitle during each
fiscal year.
(ii) On or before November 1 each year, the Secretary shall submit
the annual report required under this paragraph to the General Assembly in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OR (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
8–712.
(b) (1) The owner of any vessel to be numbered by this subtitle shall file an
application for a certificate of number with the Department.
(2) The application is on forms the Department approves, accompanied by
the requisite fee, and signed by every vessel owner.
(3) (i) The owner of the vessel shall include with the application contact
information to be used:
1. In the event of an emergency; or
2. If the vessel is at risk of becoming an abandoned or sunken
vessel as defined in § 8–721 of this subtitle.
(ii) The contact information required under this paragraph shall
include the mailing address, telephone number, and e–mail address for each owner of the
vessel.
(iii) The Department may require the owner of the vessel to provide
alternate emergency contact information.
(c) (1) (i) Certificates of number issued under this section shall be valid for
a period not to exceed 2 years.
(ii) The owner of the vessel may apply every other year for renewal
of the certificate.

HOUSE BILL 1594
(iii) The renewed certificate shall expire on December 31 of the
calendar year following the year the certificate is issued.
(iv) The Department shall record any transaction or transfer of
numbered boats.
(v) The Department may record any amount of money owing on a
vessel required to be numbered at the time of sale.
(vi) The Department may not effect a transfer of ownership until the
amount of money owed as shown on the records of the Department is fully paid or recorded
on the new title.
(vii) Any vessel that is required to be numbered under this section
that is exempt before January 1, 1974, shall be exempt from payment of the excise tax
imposed under § 8–716 of this subtitle.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection AND SUBJECT
TO SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS SECTION, the fee for:
(i) An application for a certificate of number is $70; and
(ii) A replacement or corrected certificate of number is $20.
(3) Emergency rescue boats and fire boats that belong to fire departments
or rescue squads in Maryland:
(i) Shall be exempt from all registration fees, including a fee for a
certificate of number; but
(ii) Shall apply for a registration renewal every 2 years.
(I) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
8–712.1.
(a) (1) An owner of a vessel that has a valid document issued by the U.S. Coast
Guard and that is used principally on the waters of the State for pleasure shall apply to the
Department for a Maryland use sticker.

HOUSE BILL 1594 45
(2) The Department shall issue a Maryland use sticker to any person who
submits an application and pays a fee as required by subsection (b) of this section.
(3) The Maryland use sticker issued under this section shall be valid for a
period not to exceed 2 years expiring on December 31 of the calendar year following the
year the sticker is issued.
(b) The owner of the vessel shall:
(1) Submit an application to the Department on the form that the
Department requires and that is signed by every owner of the vessel; and
(2) [Pay] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, PAY to the
Department the following fees:
(i) An application fee of $70 for the 2–year sticker; and
(ii) A fee of $20 for a replacement sticker.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
10–301.
(g) (4) Subject to paragraph (7) of this subsection AND SUBSECTION (P) OF
THIS SECTION, the fees for hunting and trapping licenses are according to the following
schedule:
(i) Resident, junior, under the age of 16 years ...................... $15.00
(ii) Resident, regular, at least 16 years old and under the age of 65
years ……………………………………………………………………………………………...$35.00
(iii) Resident, senior, at least 65 years old ................................. $5.00
(iv) Nonresident, regular, at least 16 years old ..................... $160.00
(v) Nonresident, junior, under the age of 16 years ................. $80.00
(vi) Complimentary license authorized to be issued under § 10–303
of this subtitle ……………………………………………………………………………………No fee

HOUSE BILL 1594
(vii) Nonresident 3–day hunting license ................................... $65.00
(viii) Resident apprentice ............................................................ $15.00
(ix) Nonresident apprentice ...................................................... $40.00
(x) Nonresident trapping license ............................................. $50.00
(5) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (P) OF THIS SECTION, THE fees for
individual hunting stamps are according to the following schedule:
(i) Bow and arrow stamp .......................................................... $6.00
(ii) Nonresident bow and arrow stamp ................................... $25.00
(iii) Black powder stamp ............................................................. $6.00
(iv) Nonresident black powder stamp ...................................... $25.00
(v) Maryland migratory game bird stamp .............................. $15.00
(vi) Resident bonus antlered deer stamp ................................. $10.00
(vii) Nonresident bonus antlered deer stamp for each type of deer
hunting season ………………………………………………………………………………….$25.00
(viii) Resident sika deer stamp ................................................... $10.00
(ix) Nonresident sika deer stamp ........................................... $200.00
(6) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (P) OF THIS SECTION, THE fees for
furbearer permits are according to the following schedule:
(i) Individual ............................................................................. $5.00
(ii) Group .................................................................................. $50.00
(P) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1594 47
10–309.
(b) Except as provided in § 10–309.1 of this subtitle, an individual must be
licensed by the Department as a waterfowl outfitter or a waterfowl guide before the
individual may receive monetary consideration for outfitting or guiding a hunter to hunt
wild waterfowl.
(d) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, THE fees for
licenses are as follows:
(i) Waterfowl outfitter ................................................................ $300
(ii) Waterfowl hunting guide ........................................................ $50
(2) The term of a waterfowl outfitter license and a waterfowl hunting guide
license is 1 year from August 1 through July 31 of each year.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
10–506.
(a) Subject to the exceptions of subsection (f) of this section, any person who
desires to buy, acquire, sell, transport, ship, or store at any time any fur or pelt of any wild
quadruped taken within or outside the State first shall obtain a fur dealer’s license from
the Secretary.
(b) [A] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, A person who has
resided permanently in the State for a period of not less than 6 months immediately
preceding the time of application may obtain a resident State fur dealer’s license [upon]
ON payment of a $50 fee.
(H) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
10–512.

HOUSE BILL 1594
(b) (1) A person desiring a taxidermist and fur tanner’s license shall:
(i) Apply on forms the Secretary supplies;
(ii) [Pay] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, PAY a
$50 annual license fee;
(iii) Pass an examination administered by the Department; and
(iv) Provide recent work samples for examination by the
Department.
(2) [Upon] ON receipt of the application and license fee, and examination
of work samples, the Secretary may issue the license permitting the practice of taxidermy
or fur tanning, as provided in the license, if the applicant has passed the examination and
the work samples meet minimum professional standards, as determined by the
Department.
(c) A taxidermist and fur tanner’s license:
(1) Shall expire on June 30 following the date of issuance; and
(2) May be renewed by providing information on forms the Secretary
supplies and, SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, paying the $50 annual
license fee.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – Public Safety
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) “Veteran” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State Government Article.
11–105.

HOUSE BILL 1594 49
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a person shall obtain a license
issued under this subtitle before the person engages in business as a manufacturer or
dealer, possesses explosives other than explosives for use in firearms, or possesses or stores
explosives for use in firearms in the State.
(b) (1) A person shall obtain a license to engage in business as a dealer under
this subtitle before the person engages in the business of loading or reloading small arms
ammunition in the State.
(2) The owner or operator of a mine, quarry, or other operation or business
that uses explosives, or a contractor who performs work that uses explosives, shall obtain
a license to engage in business as a dealer under this subtitle.
11–106.
(d) [Each] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, EACH application
for a license or permit shall be accompanied by the following fee:
(1) license to engage in business as a manufacturer of:
(i) less than 500 pounds of explosives ....................................... $150
(ii) 500 pounds or more of explosives but less than 5,000
pounds ……………………………………………………………………………………………...$300
(iii) 5,000 pounds or more of explosives but less than 10,000
pounds ……………………………………………………………………………………………...$750
(iv) 10,000 pounds or more of explosives ................................. $1,500
(2) license to engage in business as a dealer for:
(i) retail only ................................................................................. $75
(ii) users ....................................................................................... $150
(iii) wholesale and retail .............................................................. $300
(3) license to possess explosives other than for use in firearms .......... $150
(4) license to possess explosives for use in firearms ............................ $150
(5) storage license for:
(i) Class A – 500 pounds or more of explosives ......................... $150
(ii) Class B – less than 500 pounds of explosives ........................ $75

HOUSE BILL 1594
(6) blaster’s permit .................................................................................. $60
(F) (1) THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A RESIDENT
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE FOR
THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
12–606.
A person shall be certified by the State Fire Marshal as a nongovernmental electrical
inspector before the person inspects or certifies an electrical installation.
12–608.
(a) An applicant for a certificate shall:
(1) submit to the State Fire Marshal an application on the form the State
Fire Marshal provides;
(2) submit all documents that the State Fire Marshal requires; and
(3) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, pay to the State
Fire Marshal an application fee of $100.
(C) (1) THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL MAY WAIVE THE APPLICATION FEE
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(3) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR
A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT
PROVIDE FOR THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
12–611.
(c) A certified nongovernmental electrical inspector may renew the certification
for a 3–year term if the certificate holder:
(1) otherwise is entitled to be certified; and
(2) submits to the State Fire Marshal:

HOUSE BILL 1594 51
(i) a renewal application on the form the State Fire Marshal
provides;
(ii) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION, a renewal fee
of $50; and
(iii) satisfactory evidence of compliance with any other requirements
under this section for renewal of certification.
(F) (1) THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL MAY WAIVE THE FEE REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(2)(II) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT
PROVIDE FOR THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – State Government
9–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(m) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, “veteran” has the meaning
stated in 38 U.S.C. § 101.
Article – Transportation
11–101.
In the Maryland Vehicle Law, the following words have the meanings indicated,
unless the context requires otherwise.
11–102.
“Administration” means the Motor Vehicle Administration.
11–178.
“Veteran” has the meaning stated in § 9–901 of the State Government Article.
13–912.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every passenger car and station
wagon, except as otherwise provided in this part, is a Class A (passenger) vehicle.

HOUSE BILL 1594
(b) [For] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, FOR each Class A
(passenger) vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of 3,500 pounds or
less:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $70.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $80.50;
(2) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than 3,500
pounds but not more than 3,700 pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $80.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $85.50; and
(3) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than 3,700
pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $121.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $151.50.
(C) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE
FOR THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
13–915.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every motorcycle is a Class D
(motorcycle) vehicle.
(b) [For] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, FOR each Class D
(motorcycle) vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $55.00; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $65.00.
(C) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.

HOUSE BILL 1594 53
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE
FOR THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
13–917.
(A) [Notwithstanding] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND
NOTWITHSTANDING § 13–916(b) of this subtitle, for any Class E (truck) vehicle with a
manufacturer’s rated capacity of 3/4 ton or less and a maximum gross vehicle weight of
7,000 pounds or less, the annual registration fee is:
(1) For a vehicle with a maximum gross vehicle weight of 3,500 pounds or
less:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $83.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $93.75;
(2) Except as provided in item (4) of this [section] SUBSECTION, for a
vehicle with a maximum gross vehicle weight of more than 3,500 pounds but not more than
5,000 pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $93.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $98.75;
(3) Except as provided in item (4) of this [section] SUBSECTION, for a
vehicle with a maximum gross vehicle weight of more than 5,000 pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $108.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $138.75; and
(4) For a vehicle, regardless of the vehicle’s maximum gross vehicle weight,
for which the owner certifies on the registration application that the vehicle for which the
application is made will be used for construction activities:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $83.75; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $93.75.
(B) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(1), (2), AND (3) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A
VETERAN.

HOUSE BILL 1594
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE
FOR THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
13–937.
(a) When registered with the Administration, every multipurpose passenger
vehicle is a Class M (multipurpose) vehicle.
(b) [For] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, FOR each Class M
(multipurpose) vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of 3,500 pounds or
less:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $70.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $80.50;
(2) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than 3,500
pounds but not more than 3,700 pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $80.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $85.50; and
(3) For a vehicle with a manufacturer’s shipping weight of more than 3,700
pounds:
(i) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $121.50; and
(ii) On or after July 1, 2025, $151.50.
(c) The Administration may by rule and regulation provide for the registration
under this section of all multipurpose passenger vehicles registered under another
classification.
(D) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE
FOR THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
23–205.

HOUSE BILL 1594 55
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection AND SUBSECTION (D) OF
THIS SECTION, the Administration and the Secretary shall set the fee to be charged for
each vehicle to be inspected and tested by a facility.
(2) The fee established under this subsection:
(i) During the period from May 31, 1997, through June 30, 2025,
may not exceed $14;
(ii) During the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, may
not exceed $30; and
(iii) Except as provided in paragraph (4)(iii) of this subsection, during
the period after July 1, 2026, shall equal at least the amount in the immediately preceding
fiscal year adjusted for inflation in accordance with paragraph (3) of this subsection.
(3) During the period after June 30, 2026, the fee established under this
subsection shall equal at least the amount in the immediately preceding fiscal year
adjusted for inflation in accordance with paragraph (4) of this subsection.
(4) (i) The inflation adjustment shall equal the product of multiplying
the amount of funding in the immediately preceding fiscal year by the percentage increase
in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers.
(ii) The percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers shall be determined by comparing the average of the index for the 12
months ending April 30 immediately preceding the fiscal year for which the funding
amount is being calculated to the average index for the prior 12 months.
(iii) If there is a decline or no growth in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers, the fee amount under this paragraph shall remain unchanged.
(b) The fee shall be collected in a manner established by the Administration and
the Secretary.
(c) A specific portion of the fee shall be paid to or retained by the Administration
to cover the cost of administration and enforcement of the emissions control program, as
provided in the contract between the contractor and the State.
(D) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY WAIVE A FEE REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, FOR A VETERAN.
(2) BEFORE WAIVING A FEE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT PROVIDE
FOR THE GRANTING OF WAIVERS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1594
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.